Utah statutes.
70A-9a-801.   Savings clause.

(1)  Except as otherwise provided in this part, Laws of Utah 2013, Chapter 225 applies to a transaction or lien within its scope, even if the transaction or lien was entered into or created before July 1, 2013.

(2)  Laws of Utah 2013, Chapter 225 does not affect an action, case, or proceeding commenced before July 1, 2013.



Enacted by Chapter 252, 2000 General Session 

Enacted by Chapter 225, 2013 General Session

